Nevada, session 83, SB222.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 116.3108 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
116.3108 1. A meeting of the units’ owners must be held at
least once each year at a time and place stated in or fixed in
accordance with the bylaws. If the governing documents do not
designate an annual meeting date of the units’ owners, a meeting of
the units’ owners must be held 1 year after the date of the last
meeting of the units’ owners. If the units’ owners have not held a
meeting for 1 year, a meeting of the units’ owners must be held on
-
*SB222*

– 2 –
the following March 1. At the annual meeting of the units’ owners
held pursuant to this subsection, the ballots for the election of
members of the executive board must be opened and counted.
2. An association shall hold a special meeting of the units’
owners to address any matter affecting the common-interest
community or the association if its president, a majority of the
executive board or units’ owners constituting at least 10 percent, or
any lower percentage specified in the bylaws, of the total number of
votes in the association request that the secretary call such a
meeting. To call a special meeting, the units’ owners must submit a
written petition which is signed by the required percentage of the
total number of voting members of the association pursuant to this
subsection and which is mailed, return receipt requested, or served
by a process server to the executive board or the community
manager for the association. If the petition calls for a special
meeting, the executive board shall set the date for the special
meeting so that the special meeting is held not less than 15 days or
more than 60 days after the date on which the petition is received.
The association shall not adopt any rule or regulation which
prevents or unreasonably interferes with the collection of the
required percentage of signatures for a petition pursuant to this
subsection.
3. Not less than 15 days or more than 60 days in advance of
any meeting of the units’ owners, the secretary or other officer
specified in the bylaws shall cause notice of the meeting to be given
to the units’ owners in the manner set forth in NRS 116.31068. The
notice of the meeting must state the time and place of the meeting
and include a copy of the agenda for the meeting. The notice must
include notification of the right of a unit’s owner to:
(a) Have a copy of the minutes or a summary of the minutes of
the meeting provided to the unit’s owner upon request, in electronic
format at no charge to the unit’s owner or, if the association is
unable to provide the copy or summary in electronic format, in
paper format at a cost not to exceed 25 cents per page for the first 10
pages, and 10 cents per page thereafter.
(b) Speak to the association or executive board, unless the
executive board is meeting in executive session.
4. The agenda for a meeting of the units’ owners must consist
of:
(a) A clear and complete statement of the topics scheduled to be
considered during the meeting, including, without limitation, any
proposed amendment to the declaration or bylaws, any fees or
assessments to be imposed or increased by the association, any
budgetary changes and any proposal to remove an officer of the
association or member of the executive board.
-
*SB222*

– 3 –
(b) A list describing the items on which action may be taken and
clearly denoting that action may be taken on those items. In an
emergency, the units’ owners may take action on an item which is
not listed on the agenda as an item on which action may be taken.
(c) A period devoted to comments by units’ owners regarding
any matter affecting the common-interest community or the
association and discussion of those comments. Except in
emergencies, no action may be taken upon a matter raised under this
item of the agenda until the matter itself has been specifically
included on an agenda as an item upon which action may be taken
pursuant to paragraph (b).
5. The secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws shall
cause minutes to be recorded or otherwise taken at each meeting of
the units’ owners. Not more than 30 days after each such meeting,
the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws shall cause the
minutes or a summary of the minutes of the meeting to be made
available to the units’ owners. Except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, a copy of the minutes or a summary of the minutes must
be provided to any unit’s owner upon request, in electronic format at
no charge to the unit’s owner or, if the association is unable to
provide the copy or summary in electronic format, in paper format
at a cost not to exceed 25 cents per page for the first 10 pages, and
10 cents per page thereafter.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the minutes of
each meeting of the units’ owners must include:
(a) The date, time and place of the meeting;
(b) The substance of all matters proposed, discussed or decided
at the meeting; and
(c) The substance of remarks made by any unit’s owner at the
meeting if the unit’s owner requests that the minutes reflect his or
her remarks or, if the unit’s owner has prepared written remarks, a
copy of his or her prepared remarks if the unit’s owner submits a
copy for inclusion.
7. The executive board may establish reasonable limitations on
materials, remarks or other information to be included in the
minutes of a meeting of the units’ owners.
8. The association shall maintain the minutes of each meeting
of the units’ owners until the common-interest community is
terminated.
9. A unit’s owner may record [on audiotape or] through any
[other] means of sound or video recording or reproduction a
meeting of the units’ owners if the unit’s owner, before recording
the meeting, provides notice of his or her intent to record the
meeting to the other units’ owners who are in attendance at the
meeting.
-
*SB222*

– 4 –
10. The units’ owners may approve, at the annual meeting of
the units’ owners, the minutes of the prior annual meeting of the
units’ owners and the minutes of any prior special meetings of
the units’ owners. A quorum is not required to be present when the
units’ owners approve the minutes.
11. As used in this section, “emergency” means any occurrence
or combination of occurrences that:
(a) Could not have been reasonably foreseen;
(b) Affects the health, welfare and safety of the units’ owners or
residents of the common-interest community;
(c) Requires the immediate attention of, and possible action by,
the executive board; and
(d) Makes it impracticable to comply with the provisions of
subsection 3 or 4.
Sec. 2. NRS 116.31083 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.31083 1. A meeting of the executive board must be held
at least once every quarter, and not less than once every 100 days
and must be held at a time other than during standard business hours
at least twice annually.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 or in an
emergency or unless the bylaws of an association require a longer
period of notice, the secretary or other officer specified in the
bylaws of the association shall, not less than 10 days before the date
of a meeting of the executive board, cause notice of the meeting to
be given to the units’ owners. Such notice must be:
(a) Given to the units’ owners in the manner set forth in NRS
116.31068; or
(b) Published in a newsletter or other similar publication that is
circulated to each unit’s owner.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or the governing
documents of the association to the contrary, if the executive board
holds a meeting limited exclusively to items for which the executive
board may meet in executive session:
(a) Pursuant to paragraph (c) or (d) of subsection 3 of NRS
116.31085, the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws of
the association is required to give notice of the meeting only to a
person who may be subject to a hearing scheduled for that meeting.
(b) Pursuant to any provision of law other than paragraph (c) or
(d) of subsection 3 of NRS 116.31085, the secretary or other officer
specified in the bylaws of the association is required to:
(1) Post notice of the executive session in one or more
prominent places within the common elements of the association;
and
-
*SB222*

– 5 –
(2) Provide electronic notice of the executive session to all
units’ owners who have provided the association with an electronic
mail address.
4. In an emergency, the secretary or other officer specified in
the bylaws of the association shall, if practicable, cause notice of the
meeting to be sent prepaid by United States mail to the mailing
address of each unit within the common-interest community. If
delivery of the notice in this manner is impracticable, the notice
must be hand-delivered to each unit within the common-interest
community or posted in a prominent place or places within the
common elements of the association.
5. The notice of a meeting of the executive board must state the
time and place of the meeting and include a copy of the agenda for
the meeting or the date on which and the locations where copies of
the agenda may be conveniently obtained by the units’ owners. The
notice must include notification of the right of a unit’s owner to:
(a) Have a copy of the audio recording, the minutes or a
summary of the minutes of the meeting provided to the unit’s owner
upon request, in electronic format at no charge to the unit’s owner
or, if the association is unable to provide the copy or summary in
electronic format, in paper format at a cost not to exceed 25 cents
per page for the first 10 pages, and 10 cents per page thereafter.
(b) Speak to the association or executive board, unless the
executive board is meeting in executive session.
6. The agenda of the meeting of the executive board must
comply with the provisions of subsection 4 of NRS 116.3108. A
period required to be devoted to comments by the units’ owners and
discussion of those comments must be scheduled for both the
beginning and the end of each meeting. During the period devoted
to comments by the units’ owners and discussion of those comments
at the beginning of each meeting, comments by the units’ owners
and discussion of those comments must be limited to items listed on
the agenda. In an emergency, the executive board may take action
on an item which is not listed on the agenda as an item on which
action may be taken.
7. At least once every quarter, and not less than once every 100
days, unless the declaration or bylaws of the association impose
more stringent standards, the executive board shall review, at a
minimum, the following financial information at one of its
meetings:
(a) A current year-to-date financial statement of the association;
(b) A current year-to-date schedule of revenues and expenses for
the operating account and the reserve account, compared to the
budget for those accounts;
-
*SB222*

– 6 –
(c) A current reconciliation of the operating account of the
association;
(d) A current reconciliation of the reserve account of the
association;
(e) The latest account statements prepared by the financial
institutions in which the accounts of the association are maintained;
and
(f) The current status of any civil action or claim submitted to
arbitration or mediation in which the association is a party.
8. The secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws shall
cause each meeting of the executive board to be audio recorded and
the minutes to be recorded or otherwise taken at each meeting of the
executive board, but if the executive board is meeting in executive
session, the meeting must not be audio recorded. Not more than 30
days after each such meeting, the secretary or other officer specified
in the bylaws shall cause the audio recording of the meeting, the
minutes of the meeting and a summary of the minutes of the
meeting to be made available to the units’ owners. Except as
otherwise provided in this subsection, a copy of the audio recording,
the minutes or a summary of the minutes must be provided to any
unit’s owner upon request, in electronic format at no charge to the
unit’s owner or, if the association is unable to provide the copy or
summary in electronic format, in paper format at a cost not to
exceed 25 cents per page for the first 10 pages, and 10 cents per
page thereafter.
9. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 10 and NRS
116.31085, the minutes of each meeting of the executive board must
include:
(a) The date, time and place of the meeting;
(b) Those members of the executive board who were present and
those members who were absent at the meeting;
(c) The substance of all matters proposed, discussed or decided
at the meeting;
(d) A record of each member’s vote on any matter decided by
vote at the meeting; and
(e) The substance of remarks made by any unit’s owner who
addresses the executive board at the meeting if the unit’s owner
requests that the minutes reflect his or her remarks or, if the unit’s
owner has prepared written remarks, a copy of his or her prepared
remarks if the unit’s owner submits a copy for inclusion.
10. The executive board may establish reasonable limitations
on materials, remarks or other information to be included in the
minutes of its meetings.
-
*SB222*

– 7 –
11. The association shall maintain the minutes of each meeting
of the executive board until the common-interest community is
terminated.
12. A unit’s owner may record [on audiotape or] through any
[other] means of sound or video recording or reproduction a
meeting of the executive board, unless the executive board is
meeting in executive session, if the unit’s owner, before recording
the meeting, provides notice of his or her intent to record the
meeting to the members of the executive board and the other units’
owners who are in attendance at the meeting.
13. As used in this section, “emergency” means any occurrence
or combination of occurrences that:
(a) Could not have been reasonably foreseen;
(b) Affects the health, welfare and safety of the units’ owners or
residents of the common-interest community;
(c) Requires the immediate attention of, and possible action by,
the executive board; and
(d) Makes it impracticable to comply with the provisions of
subsection 2, 3 or 6.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB222*